root/usr/share/postgresql/8.4/tsearch_data/czech.affix
flag *A:
   číST    > -íST,TU
   číST    > -íST,TEš
   číST    > -íST,TE
   číST    > -íST,TEME
   číST    > -íST,TETE
   číST    > -íST,TOU
   číST    > -íST,TI
   číST    > -íST,TěME
   číST    > -íST,TěTE
   číST    > -íST,ETL
   číST    > -íST,ETLA
   číST    > -íST,ETLO
   číST    > -íST,ETLI
   číST    > -íST,ETLY
   číST    > -íST,TA
   číST    > -íST,TOUC
   číST    > -íST,TOUCE
   [DNT]íST    > -íST,ěTU
   [DNT]íST    > -íST,ěTEš
   [DNT]íST    > -íST,ěTE
   [DNT]íST    > -íST,ěTEME
   [DNT]íST    > -íST,ěTETE
   [DNT]íST    > -íST,ěTOU
   [DNT]íST    > -íST,ěť
   [DNT]íST    > -íST,ěťME
   [DNT]íST    > -íST,ěťTE
   [DNT]íST    > -íST,ěTL
   [DNT]íST    > -íST,ěTLA
   [DNT]íST    > -íST,ěTLO
   [DNT]íST    > -íST,ěTLI
   [DNT]íST    > -íST,ěTLY
   [DNT]íST    > -íST,ěTA
   [DNT]íST    > -íST,ěTOUC
   [DNT]íST    > -íST,ěTOUCE
   [^čDNT]íST    > -íST,EDU
   [^čDNT]íST    > -íST,EDEš
   [^čDNT]íST    > -íST,EDE
   [^čDNT]íST    > -íST,EDEME
   [^čDNT]íST    > -íST,EDETE
   [^čDNT]íST    > -íST,EDOU
   [^čDNT]íST    > -íST,Eď
   [^čDNT]íST    > -íST,EďME
   [^čDNT]íST    > -íST,EďTE
   [^čDNT]íST    > -íST,EDL
   [^čDNT]íST    > -íST,EDLA
   [^čDNT]íST    > -íST,EDLO
   [^čDNT]íST    > -íST,EDLI
   [^čDNT]íST    > -íST,EDLY
   [^čDNT]íST    > -íST,EDA
   [^čDNT]íST    > -íST,EDOUC
   [^čDNT]íST    > -íST,EDOUCE
   NéST    > -éST,ESU
   NéST    > -éST,ESEš
   NéST    > -éST,ESE
   NéST    > -éST,ESEME
   NéST    > -éST,ESETE
   NéST    > -éST,ESOU
   NéST    > -éST,ES
   NéST    > -éST,ESME
   NéST    > -éST,ESTE
   NéST    > -éST,ESL
   NéST    > -éST,ESLA
   NéST    > -éST,ESLO
   NéST    > -éST,ESLI
   NéST    > -éST,ESLY
   NéST    > -éST,ESA
   NéST    > -éST,ESOUC
   NéST    > -éST,ESOUCE
   [^N]éST    > -éST,ETU
   [^N]éST    > -éST,ETEš
   [^N]éST    > -éST,ETE
   [^N]éST    > -éST,ETEME
   [^N]éST    > -éST,ETETE
   [^N]éST    > -éST,ETOU
   [^N]éST    > -éST,Eť
   [^N]éST    > -éST,EťME
   [^N]éST    > -éST,EťTE
   [^N]éST    > -éST,ETL
   [^N]éST    > -éST,ETLA
   [^N]éST    > -éST,ETLO
   [^N]éST    > -éST,ETLI
   [^N]éST    > -éST,ETLY
   [^N]éST    > -éST,ETA
   [^N]éST    > -éST,ETOUC
   [^N]éST    > -éST,ETOUCE
   áST    > -áST,ADU
   áST    > -áST,ADEš
   áST    > -áST,ADE
   áST    > -áST,ADEME
   áST    > -áST,ADETE
   áST    > -áST,ADOU
   áST    > -áST,Aď
   áST    > -áST,AďME
   áST    > -áST,AďTE
   áST    > -áST,ADL
   áST    > -áST,ADLA
   áST    > -áST,ADLO
   áST    > -áST,ADLI
   áST    > -áST,ADLY
   áST    > -áST,ADA
   áST    > -áST,ADOUC
   áST    > -áST,ADOUCE
   éZT    > -éZT,EZU
   éZT    > -éZT,EZEš
   éZT    > -éZT,EZE
   éZT    > -éZT,EZEME
   éZT    > -éZT,EZETE
   éZT    > -éZT,EZOU
   éZT    > -éZT,EZ
   éZT    > -éZT,EZME
   éZT    > -éZT,EZTE
   éZT    > -éZT,EZL
   éZT    > -éZT,EZLA
   éZT    > -éZT,EZLO
   éZT    > -éZT,EZLI
   éZT    > -éZT,EZLY
   éZT    > -éZT,EZA
   éZT    > -éZT,EZOUC
   éZT    > -éZT,EZOUCE
   RáT    > -RáT,ERU
   RáT    > -RáT,EREš
   RáT    > -RáT,ERE
   RáT    > -RáT,EREME
   RáT    > -RáT,ERETE
   RáT    > -RáT,EROU
   RáT    > -RáT,ER
   RáT    > -RáT,ERME
   RáT    > -RáT,ERTE
   RáT    > -RáT,ERA
   RáT    > -RáT,EROUC
   RáT    > -RáT,EROUCE
   LáT    > -LáT,ELU
   LáT    > -LáT,ELEš
   LáT    > -LáT,ELE
   LáT    > -LáT,ELEME
   LáT    > -LáT,ELETE
   LáT    > -LáT,ELOU
   LáT    > -LáT,EL
   LáT    > -LáT,ELME
   LáT    > -LáT,ELTE
   LáT    > -LáT,ELA
   LáT    > -LáT,ELOUC
   LáT    > -LáT,ELOUCE
   [^LR]áT    > -áT,U
   [^LR]áT    > -áT,Eš
   [^LR]áT    > -áT,E
   [^LR]áT    > -áT,EME
   [^LR]áT    > -áT,ETE
   [^LR]áT    > -áT,OU
   [^LR]áT    > -áT,I
   [^LR]áT    > -áT,ěME
   [^LR]áT    > -áT,ěTE
   áT    > -áT,AL
   áT    > -áT,ALA
   áT    > -áT,ALO
   áT    > -áT,ALI
   áT    > -áT,ALY
   CT    > -T,I
   CI    > -I,T
   éC[IT]    > -éCT,EčU
   éC[IT]    > -éCT,EKU
   éC[IT]    > -éCT,EčEš
   éC[IT]    > -éCT,EčE
   éC[IT]    > -éCT,EčEME
   éC[IT]    > -éCT,EčETE
   éC[IT]    > -éCT,EčOU
   éC[IT]    > -éCT,EKOU
   éC[IT]    > -éCT,Eč
   éC[IT]    > -éCT,EC
   éC[IT]    > -éCT,EčME
   éC[IT]    > -éCT,ECME
   éC[IT]    > -éCT,EčTE
   éC[IT]    > -éCT,ECTE
   [^L]éC[IT]    > -éCT,EKL
   [^L]éC[IT]    > -éCT,EKLA
   [^L]éC[IT]    > -éCT,EKLO
   [^L]éC[IT]    > -éCT,EKLI
   [^L]éC[IT]    > -éCT,EKLY
   [^L]éC[IT]    > -éCT,EKA
   [^L]éC[IT]    > -éCT,EKOUC
   [^L]éC[IT]    > -éCT,EKOUCE
   OUC[IT]    > -OUCT,UčU
   OUC[IT]    > -OUCT,UKU
   OUC[IT]    > -OUCT,UčEš
   OUC[IT]    > -OUCT,UčE
   OUC[IT]    > -OUCT,UčEME
   OUC[IT]    > -OUCT,UčETE
   OUC[IT]    > -OUCT,UčOU
   OUC[IT]    > -OUCT,UKOU
   OUC[IT]    > -OUCT,Uč
   OUC[IT]    > -OUCT,UC
   OUC[IT]    > -OUCT,UčME
   OUC[IT]    > -OUCT,UCME
   OUC[IT]    > -OUCT,UčTE
   OUC[IT]    > -OUCT,UCTE
   OUC[IT]    > -CT,KL
   OUC[IT]    > -CT,KLA
   OUC[IT]    > -CT,KLO
   OUC[IT]    > -CT,KLI
   OUC[IT]    > -CT,KLY
   OUC[IT]    > -OUCT,UKA
   OUC[IT]    > -OUCT,UKOUC
   OUC[IT]    > -OUCT,UKOUCE
   OC[IT]    > -CI,HU
   OC[IT]    > -OCI,ůžU
   OC[IT]    > -OCI,ůžEš
   OC[IT]    > -OCI,ůžE
   OC[IT]    > -OCI,ůžEME
   OC[IT]    > -OCI,ůžETE
   OC[IT]    > -CI,HOU
   OC[IT]    > -OCI,ůžOU
   OC[IT]    > -CI,HL
   OC[IT]    > -CI,HLA
   OC[IT]    > -CI,HLO
   OC[IT]    > -CI,HLI
   OC[IT]    > -CI,HLY
   OC[IT]    > -CI,HA
   OC[IT]    > -CI,HOUC
   OC[IT]    > -CI,HOUCE
   OVAT    > -OVAT,UJI
   OVAT    > -OVAT,UJEš
   OVAT    > -OVAT,UJE
   OVAT    > -OVAT,UJEME
   OVAT    > -OVAT,UJETE
   OVAT    > -OVAT,UJí
   OVAT    > -OVAT,UJ
   OVAT    > -OVAT,UJTE
   OVAT    > -OVAT,UJME
   OVAT    > -OVAT,UJíC
   OVAT    > -OVAT,UJíCE
   [^O]VAT    > -AT,U
   [^O]VAT    > -AT,Eš
   [^O]VAT    > -AT,E
   [^O]VAT    > -AT,EME
   [^O]VAT    > -AT,ETE
   [^O]VAT    > -AT,OU
   AVAT    > -AT,
   AVAT    > -AT,ME
   AVAT    > -AT,TE
   AVAT    > -T,JE
   AVAT    > -T,JíC
   AVAT    > -T,JíCE
   [^AIO]VAT    > -AT,I
   [^AIO]VAT    > -AT,ěME
   [^AIO]VAT    > -AT,ěTE
   ZAT    > -ZAT,žU
   ZAT    > -ZAT,žEš
   ZAT    > -ZAT,žE
   ZAT    > -ZAT,žEME
   ZAT    > -ZAT,žETE
   ZAT    > -ZAT,žOU
   [^áíU]ZAT    > -ZAT,ž
   [^áíU]ZAT    > -ZAT,žME
   [^áíU]ZAT    > -ZAT,žTE
   áZAT    > -áZAT,Až
   áZAT    > -áZAT,AžME
   áZAT    > -áZAT,AžTE
   íZAT    > -íZAT,Iž
   íZAT    > -íZAT,IžME
   íZAT    > -íZAT,IžTE
   UZAT    > -AT,EJ
   UZAT    > -AT,EJME
   UZAT    > -AT,EJTE
   [^áíU]ZAT    > -ZAT,žíC
   [^áíU]ZAT    > -ZAT,žíCE
   [YU]ZAT    > -T,JE
   [YU]ZAT    > -T,JíC
   [YU]ZAT    > -T,JíCE
   SAT    > -SAT,šU
   SAT    > -SAT,šEš
   SAT    > -SAT,šE
   SAT    > -SAT,šEME
   SAT    > -SAT,šETE
   SAT    > -SAT,šOU
   SAT    > -SAT,š
   SAT    > -SAT,šME
   SAT    > -SAT,šTE
   SAT    > -SAT,šíC
   SAT    > -SAT,šíCE
   RAT    > -RAT,ERU
   RAT    > -RAT,EREš
   RAT    > -RAT,ERE
   RAT    > -RAT,EREME
   RAT    > -RAT,ERETE
   RAT    > -RAT,EROU
   RAT    > -RAT,ER
   RAT    > -RAT,ERME
   RAT    > -RAT,ERTE
   RAT    > -RAT,ERA
   RAT    > -RAT,EROUC
   RAT    > -RAT,EROUCE
   AKAT    > -AKAT,áčU
   AKAT    > -AKAT,áčEš
   AKAT    > -AKAT,áčE
   AKAT    > -AKAT,áčEME
   AKAT    > -AKAT,áčETE
   AKAT    > -AKAT,áčOU
   AKAT    > -AKAT,Ač
   AKAT    > -AKAT,AčME
   AKAT    > -AKAT,AčTE
   AKAT    > -AKAT,AčíC
   AKAT    > -AKAT,AčíCE
   [^A]KAT    > -KAT,čU
   [^A]KAT    > -KAT,čEš
   [^A]KAT    > -KAT,čE
   [^A]KAT    > -KAT,čEME
   [^A]KAT    > -KAT,čETE
   [^A]KAT    > -KAT,čOU
   KAT    > -AT,EJ
   KAT    > -AT,EJME
   KAT    > -AT,EJTE
   [^KRSVZ]AT    > -AT,U
   [^KRSVZ]AT    > -AT,Eš
   [^KRSVZ]AT    > -AT,E
   [^KRSVZ]AT    > -AT,EME
   [^KRSVZ]AT    > -AT,ETE
   [^KRSVZ]AT    > -AT,OU
   [AEIYě][^KRSVZ]AT    > -AT,
   [AEIYě][^KRSVZ]AT    > -AT,ME
   [AEIYě][^KRSVZ]AT    > -AT,TE
   [^O]U[^RSVZ]AT    > -AT,
   [^O]U[^RSVZ]AT    > -AT,ME
   [^O]U[^RSVZ]AT    > -AT,TE
   [^RVZ]AT    > -T,JE
   [^RVZ]AT    > -T,JíC
   [^RVZ]AT    > -T,JíCE
   [CSZ][BMP]AT    > -AT,I
   [CSZ][BMP]AT    > -AT,ěME
   [CSZ][BMP]AT    > -AT,ěTE
   STAT    > -T,ň
   STAT    > -T,ňME
   STAT    > -T,ňTE
   [^CSZ][BMP]AT    > -AT,EJ
