root/usr/share/postgresql/8.4/tsearch_data/czech.dict
aktivovat/ATN
apretovat/ATN
bácnout/ATN
betonovat/ATN
bohatnout/AN
bronzovat/ATN
centralizovat/ATN
cukernatět/ATN
čichnout/AN
decentralizovat/ATN
děkovat/ATN
deprivovat/ATN
digitalizovat/ATN
dlužit/ATN
dobrnět/AN
dočíst/ATN
doeditovat/ATN
dohlídnout/AN
dohýřit/ATN
doklečet/AN
dokořenit/ATN
dokumetovat/ATN
dolítnout/AN
doměřovat/ATN
donucovat/ATN
doperlit/AN
doporučovat/ATN
dopýřit/AN
dorýsovat/ATN
doskřípět/AN
dostačovat/AN
dosvrbět/AN
došpendlovat/ATN
dotisknout/ACTN
dotvrzovat/ATN
dovojákovat/AN
dozbrojovat/ATN
dráždit/ATN
duplikovat/ATN
eskortovat/ATN
fačovat/ATN
fláknout/ATN
fungovat/ATN
hačnout/AN
hemžit/AN
hojit/ATN
hrnout/ATN
hutnit/ATN
chořet/AJN
ideologizovat/ATN
inicializovat/ATN
intonovat/ATN
jistit/ACN
kanout/AN
klapat/AJTN
klouzkovat/ATN
kolíkovat/ATN
konferovat/ATN
konzervovat/ATN
kotvit/ATN
krknout/ATN
křižovat/ATN
kvapit/ATN
laminovat/ATN
lexikalizovat/ATN
loknout/ATN
malátnět/AJN
meditovat/AN
mistrovat/ATN
motorizovat/ATN
mystifikovat/ATN
nacedit/ACN
nadehtovat/ATN
nadrat/ATN
nafládrovat/ATN
nahřešit/ATN
naklást/ATN
nakrajovat/ATN
naládovat/ATN
naloupit/ATN
namořit/ATN
napěchovat/ATN
napořizovat/ATN
narežírovat/ATN
naschnout/AN
nastavit/ATN
nasvěcovat/ATN
naštepovat/ATN
natřít/ATN
navlhnout/ATN
nažrat/ATN
nostrifikovat/ATN
obestřít/ATN
obkovat/AJTN
obloudit/ACN
obroubit/ATN
obtahovat/ATN
očadit/ACN
odblokovat/ATN
odčleňovat/ATN
odfiknout/ATN
odhodit/ACN
odkašlat/ATN
odkrájet/ATN
odlepovat/ATN
odmašťovat/ATN
odnacizovat/ATN
odpisovat/ATN
odporovat/AN
odročit/ATN
odsířit/ATN
odstrojit/ATN
odšpendlovat/ATN
odtočit/ATN
odvelet/ATN
odzátkovat/ATN
ohluchnout/ATN
ochořet/AJN
okopat/AJTN
okyselovat/ATN
omlacovat/ATN
opatřovat/ATN
oplozovat/ATN
oprubovat/AN
osazovat/ATN
osnímkovat/ATN
osvobozovat/ATN
otextovat/ATN
ovinout/ATN
ozřejmit/ATXN
pálkovat/ATN
pasivovat/ATN
perforovat/ATN
plakátovat/AN
plyšovat/ATN
počeštit/ATN
podhrabat/ATN
podložit/ATN
podrobit/ATN
podškrtnout/ATN
poházet/AJTN
pohupovat/ATN
pokleknout/ATN
pokročit/ATN
políbit/ATN
pominout/ATN
poodhrnout/ATN
popolézt/AN
porobit/ATN
poskákat/ATN
postoupit/ATXN
poškodit/ACN
potrápit/ATN
povlakovat/ATN
pozastřít/ATN
požvanit/AN
probarvit/ATN
procvičovat/ATN
profiknout/ATN
prohrábnout/ATN
proklepnout/ATN
prokroužit/AN
prolustrovat/ATN
promydlit/ATN
proploužit/AN
prosáknout/ATN
prostituovat/ATN
prošlapat/AJTN
protlačovat/ATN
proviňovat/AN
průměrovat/ATN
přecvičit/ATN
předestoupit/ATXN
předmastit/ACN
předředit/ATN
předupravit/ATN
přehlásit/ACN
přechlazovat/ATN
překonfigurovat/ATN
překřížit/ATN
přeležet/ATN
přemlátit/ACN
přepažit/ATN
přepravit/ATN
přeřvat/AN
přesoustružit/ATN
přešetřit/ATN
přetěžit/ATN
přeúčtovat/ATN
převtělit/ATN
přibouchnout/ATN
přihlásit/ACN
přiklusat/AJN
přikvačit/AN
přímit/ATN
připichovat/ATN
připřahovat/ATN
přisolovat/ATN
přisvojovat/ATN
přitlumit/ATN
přivlastnit/ATN
pudrovat/ATN
raftovat/AN
referovat/ATN
restaurovat/ATN
rozbrousit/ACN
rozesmažit/ATN
rozkazovat/ATN
rozloučit/ATN
rozparádit/ATN
rozrušovat/ATN
rozšroubovat/ATN
rozvětvovat/ATN
řečnit/ATN
sebrat/ATXN
sestřelovat/ATN
shodit/ACN
sklapovat/ATN
slevit/ATN
smrštit/ATN
spláchnout/ATN
sprdnout/ATN
stlát/AT
sugerovat/ATN
syntetisovat/ATN
šlechtit/ATN
tabelovat/ATN
tlesknout/AN
trysknout/AN
ucuknout/AN
uchopovat/ATN
ukvapovat/ATN
unavit/ATN
upytlačit/ATN
usnadňovat/ATN
uštvat/ATN
uvážit/ATN
varovat/ATN
vhazovat/ATN
vložit/ATN
vroubit/ATN
vyasfaltovat/ATN
vycpat/ATN
vydrolovat/ATN
vyhovovat/AN
vyklestit/ACN
vykukovat/AN
vyluzovat/ATN
vyobcovat/ATN
vypochodovat/ATN
vyronit/ATN
vysmyknout/AN
vysuzovat/ATN
vytanout/AN
vyudit/ACN
vyznačit/ATN
vzplanout/AN
zaboxovat/AN
zadekretovat/ATN
zahlídnout/ATXN
zachycovat/ATN
zakonspirovat/ATN
zalakovat/ATN
zamilovat/ATN
zaparkovat/ATN
zapřáhnout/ACN
zasádrovat/ATN
zastřelovat/ATN
zaštipovat/ATN
zatušovat/ATN
zavonět/AN
zbilancovat/ATN
zdělit/ATN
zeditovat/ATN
zfušovat/ATN
zchromnout/AN
zklidnět/AJTN
zkrmit/ATN
zmáčet/AJTN
zmravnit/ATN
zneprůhledňovat/ATN
znovuzrozovat/AT
zplnomocnit/ATN
zprůhledňovat/ATN
zreorganizovat/ATN
ztopořit/ATN
zvědečtit/ATN
žárlit/ATN
